Maryland, session 2025, SB0297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–2418.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this part, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0297*

SENATE BILL 297
(1) provide sign language interpretation services in the State; or
(2) represent to the public, by description of services or use of a title or
designation, that the individual is authorized to provide sign language interpretation
services in the State.
Chapter 269 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Beginning [January 1, 2025] JULY 1, 2026, an individual who provides sign
language interpretation services in the State shall meet the requirements of Title 9,
Subtitle 24, Part III of the State Government Article, as enacted by Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the member of the State
Board of Sign Language Interpreters who is required to have a license issued under this
Act and who is appointed to the Board under § 9–2411 of the State Government Article, as
enacted by Section 3 of this Act, before [January 1, 2025] JULY 1, 2026, may satisfy the
license requirement by holding a current nationally or regionally recognized certification,
as defined in § 9–2401 of the State Government Article, as enacted by Section 3 of this Act,
or by meeting other criteria established by the Board.
Chapter 270 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Beginning [January 1, 2025] JULY 1, 2026, an individual who provides sign
language interpretation services in the State shall meet the requirements of Title 9,
Subtitle 24, Part III of the State Government Article, as enacted by Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the member of the State
Board of Sign Language Interpreters who is required to have a license issued under this
Act and who is appointed to the Board under § 9–2411 of the State Government Article, as
enacted by Section 3 of this Act, before [January 1, 2025] JULY 1, 2026, may satisfy the
license requirement by holding a current nationally or regionally recognized certification,
as defined in § 9–2401 of the State Government Article, as enacted by Section 3 of this Act,
or by meeting other criteria established by the Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.